nl: Type foutcorrectie: ECC load-reduced (LRDIMM); ECC registered (RDIMM); ECC unbuffered (UDIMM); Niet-ECC; On-die ECC; Andere
cs: Typ korekce chyb: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Non-ECC; On-die ECC; Jiné
zh-CN: 纠错类型: ECC 减载型 (LRDIMM); ECC 寄存型 (RDIMM); ECC 无缓冲型 (UDIMM); 非 ECC; 芯片内 ECC; 其他
tr: Hata düzeltme tipi: ECC Yük Azaltmalı (LRDIMM); ECC Kayıtlı (RDIMM); ECC Tamponsuz (UDIMM); ECC olmayan; Çip üzeri ECC; Diğer
sv: Felkorrigeringstyp: ECC lastreducerad (LRDIMM); ECC registrerad (RDIMM); ECC obuffrad (UDIMM); Icke-ECC; On-die ECC; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ korekcie chýb: ECC so zníženou záťažou (LRDIMM); ECC registrovaná (RDIMM); ECC nebufferovaná (UDIMM); Bez ECC; On-die ECC; Iné
th: ประเภทการแก้ไขข้อผิดพลาด: ECC แบบลดโหลด (LRDIMM); ECC แบบรีจิสเตอร์ (RDIMM); ECC แบบไม่บัฟเฟอร์ (UDIMM); แรม Non-ECC; On-die ECC; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Klaidų taisymo tipas: ECC sumažinta apkrova (LRDIMM); ECC registruota (RDIMM); ECC nebuferizuota (UDIMM); Non-ECC; Lusto ECC; Kita
vi: Loại sửa lỗi: Ecc giảm tải (lrdimm); Ecc đăng ký (rdimm); Ecc không đệm (udimm); Không có ECC; Ecc trên chip; Khác
hu: Hibajavítás típusa: ECC terheléscsökkentett (LRDIMM); ECC regisztrált (RDIMM); ECC pufferelt nélküli (UDIMM); Nem ECC; Chipen belüli ECC; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de correção de erro: ECC de carga reduzida (LRDIMM); ECC registrado (RDIMM); ECC sem buffer (UDIMM); Não ECC; ECC no chip; Outro
ru: Тип коррекции ошибок: ECC с уменьшенной нагрузкой (LRDIMM); ECC регистровая (RDIMM); ECC небуферизованная (UDIMM); Без ECC; Встроенная ECC; Другой
de: Fehlerkorrekturtyp: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Nicht-ECC; On-Die-ECC; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de corrección de errores: ECC de carga reducida (LRDIMM); ECC registrado (RDIMM); ECC sin búfer (UDIMM); No ECC; ECC en matriz; Otros
hr-HR: Tip korekcije pogreške: ECC smanjena opterećenost (LRDIMM); ECC registrirana (RDIMM); ECC nepuferirana (UDIMM); Non-ECC; ECC na čipu; Ostalo
fr: Type de correction d’erreur: ECC charge réduite (LRDIMM); ECC enregistré (RDIMM); ECC non tamponné (UDIMM); Non ECC; ECC sur puce; Autre
it: Tipo di correzione degli errori: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Non ECC; ECC on-die; Altro
zh-TW: 錯誤修正類型: ECC 減載 (LRDIMM); ECC 暫存器 (RDIMM); ECC 無緩衝 (UDIMM); Non-ECC; 晶片內建 ECC; 其他
ko: 오류 수정 유형: ECC 부하 감소형 (LRDIMM); ECC 레지스터드 (RDIMM); ECC 언버퍼드 (UDIMM); 비ECC; 온다이 ECC; 기타
nb: Feilrettingstype: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Ikke-ECC; On-die ECC; Annet
ro-RO: Tip corectare erori: ECC cu încărcare redusă (LRDIMM); ECC înregistrat (RDIMM); ECC nebufferizat (UDIMM); Non-ECC; ECC pe cip; Altele
pl: Typ korekcji błędów: ECC load-reduced (LRDIMM); ECC rejestrowany (RDIMM); ECC niebuforowany (UDIMM); Non-ECC; ECC w kości; Inne
ja: エラー訂正タイプ: ECCロード低減型（LRDIMM）; ECCレジスタード（RDIMM）; ECCアンバッファード（UDIMM）; 非ECC; オンダイECC; その他
da: Fejlkorrektionstype: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Ikke-ECC; On-die ECC; Andet
sl-SI: Tip popravljanja napak: ECC z zmanjšano obremenitvijo (LRDIMM); ECC registriran (RDIMM); ECC nepomirjen (UDIMM); Ne-ECC; ECC na čipu; Drugo
en: Error correction type: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Non-ECC; On-die ECC; Other
fi: Virheenkorjaustyyppi: ECC kuorma-alennettu (LRDIMM); ECC rekisteröity (RDIMM); ECC puskuroimaton (UDIMM); Non-ECC; Sirussa oleva ECC; Muu
bg-BG: Тип корекция на грешки: ECC с намалено натоварване (LRDIMM); ECC регистрирана (RDIMM); ECC небуферирана (UDIMM); Non-ECC; ECC на чипа; Други
el: Τύπος διόρθωσης σφαλμάτων: ECC Load-Reduced (LRDIMM); ECC Registered (RDIMM); ECC Unbuffered (UDIMM); Μη ECC; On-die ECC; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de correção de erro: ECC com carga reduzida (LRDIMM); ECC registado (RDIMM); ECC sem buffer (UDIMM); Sem código de correção automática de erros; ECC no chip; Outro